ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 전자책 단말기 부품: 전자책 리더 커버 및 하우징; 전자책 리더 로직 보드; 전자책 리더 교체용 케이블; 전자책 단말기 액정/액정 디지타이저
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų dalys: Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų dangteliai ir korpusai; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų logikos plokštės; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų pakeičiamieji kabeliai; Elektroninių knygų skaitytuvų ekranai ir ekranų skaitmeninimo įrenginiai
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Delar för e-bokläsare: E-bokläsare-skal och höljen; E-bokläsare-logikkort; E-bokläsare-ersättningskablar; Ersättningsskärmar för e-bokläsare
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > E-könyv-olvasó-alkatrészek: E-könyv-olvasó borítások és házak; E-könyv-olvasó logikai kártyák; E-könyv-olvasó cserekábelek; E-könyv-olvasó-képernyők és -képernyő-digitalizálók
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Peças de leitor E-Book: Capas e caixas para e-book reader; Placas lógicas para e-book reader; Cabos de substituição para e-book reader; Ecrãs de leitor de E-Book e ecrãs de digitadores
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > E-Book Reader Parts: E-Book Reader Covers & Housings; E-Book Reader Logic Boards; E-Book Reader Replacement Cables; E-Book Reader Screens & Screen Digitizers
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Diely čítačky elektronických kníh: Kryty a krytie čítačiek e-kníh; Logické dosky čítačiek e-kníh; Náhradné káble čítačiek e-kníh; Obrazovky a digitalizátory obrazoviek čítačiek elektronických kníh
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Детали для электронных книг: Крышки и корпуса для электронных книг; Логические платы для электронных книг; Сменные кабели для электронных книг; Экраны и дигитайзеры для электронных книг
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Peças para leitores de e-books: Capas e carcaças para e-reader; Logic boards para e-reader; Cabos de reposição para e-reader; Telas de reposição para leitores de e-books
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Piezas para lectores de libros electrónicos: Cubiertas y carcasas para lector de libros electrónicos; Placas lógicas para lector de libros electrónicos; Cables de reemplazo para lector de libros electrónicos; Pantallas de repuesto para lectores de libros electrónicos
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Ersatzteile für E-Book-Reader: E-Book-Reader-Abdeckungen und -Gehäuse; E-Book-Reader-Logikplatinen; E-Book-Reader-Ersatzkabel; Ersatzbildschirme für E-Book-Reader
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 电子书阅读器部件: 电子书阅读器保护套和外壳; 电子书阅读器逻辑板; 电子书阅读器替换线缆; 电子书阅读器屏幕和触控感应层
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Части за електронни четци: Покрития за електронни четци; Главни платки за електронни четци; Резервни кабели за електронен четец; Екрани и дигитайзери за четци на електронни книги
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 電子書閱讀器零件: 電子書閱讀器外殼與機殼; 電子書閱讀器邏輯板; 電子書閱讀器替換纜線; 電子書閱讀器螢幕/觸控面板
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Dele til e-bogslæsere: E-bogslæser – omslag og holdere; E-bogslæser – logiske kort; E-bogslæser – ekstra kabler; Skærme til e-bogslæsere
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > 電子書籍リーダーパーツ: 電子書籍リーダーカバー・ハウジング; 電子書籍リーダーロジックボード; 電子書籍リーダー交換用ケーブル; 電子書籍リーダー用スクリーン・デジタイザ
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Phụ tùng máy đọc sách điện tử: Vỏ bảo vệ và vỏ đầu đọc sách; Bảng logic đầu đọc sách; Cáp thay thế đầu đọc sách; Màn hình và bộ số hóa màn hình máy đọc sách điện tử
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Dijelovi e-čitača: Futrole za e-čitače; Logičke ploče za e-čitač; Zamjenski kabeli za e-čitač; Zasloni e-čitača i digitalizatori zaslona
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > อะไหล่เครื่องอ่านอีบุ๊ก: ฝาครอบและตัวเครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; บอร์ดควบคุมเครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; สายเคเบิลทดแทนเครื่องอ่านหนังสืออิเล็กทรอนิกส์; เครื่องแปลงหน้าจอดิจิทัลและหน้าจอเครื่องอ่านอีบุ๊ก
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Componenti per lettori di e-book: Coppertine e involucri del lettore e-book; Schede logiche del lettore e-book; Cavi di ricambio del lettore e-book; Schermi sostitutivi per lettori di e-book
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > E-Kitap Okuyucu Parçaları: E-kitap Okuyucu Kapakları ve Muhafazaları; E-kitap Okuyucu Mantık Kartları; E-kitap Okuyucu Yedek Kabloları; E-Kitap Okuyucu Yedek Ekranları
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Piese pentru cititoare de cărți electronice: Capace și carcase pentru cititoare electronice; Plăci logice pentru cititoare electronice; Cabluri de înlocuire pentru cititoare electronice; Ecrane pentru cititoare de cărți electronice și digitizoare pentru ecrane
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Pièces pour liseuses numériques: Coques et boîtiers pour liseuse; Cartes logiques pour liseuse; Câbles de remplacement pour liseuse; Écrans de rechange pour liseuses numériques
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Deli za bralnike e-knjig: Ovitki in ohišja za e-bralnike; Logične plošče za e-bralnike; Nadomestni kabli za e-bralnike; Zasloni in digitalizatorji zaslonov e-knjig
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Onderdelen voor e-readers: E-reader covers en behuizingen; E-reader logic boards; E-reader vervangingskabels; Vervangende schermen voor e-readers
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Części do czytników e-booków: Pokrywy i obudowy czytników e‑booków; Płyty logiczne czytników e‑booków; Kable zamienne do czytników e‑booków; Zapasowe ekrany do czytników e-booków
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > E-kirjanlukijan osat: E-lukijan kuoret ja kotelot; E-lukijan logiikkalevy; E-lukijan vaihtokaapeli; E-kirjanlukijan näytöt ja näytönsuojat
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Díly čteček elektronických knih: Kryty a pouzdra e-book čteček; Logické desky e-book čteček; Náhradní kabely pro e-book čtečky; Displeje a dotykové vrstvy pro čtečky elektronických knih
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Deler til E-boklesere: Deksler og hus til e-bokleser; Logikkort til e-bokleser; Reservekabler til e-bokleser; Skjermer og skjermdigitalisatorer for E-boklesere
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Ανταλλακτικά συσκευών ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων: Καλύμματα και περιβλήματα για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Μητρικές πλακέτες για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Καλώδια αντικατάστασης για συσκευές ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων; Οθόνες & ψηφιοποιητές οθόνης συσκευών ανάγνωσης ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων